New York, session 2025-2026, S9191.
do enact as follows:
Section 1. The general obligations law is amended by adding a new
section 5-338 to read as follows:
§ 5-338. Conflicting pharmacy ownership. 1. As used in this section:
(a) "Pharmacy" has the meaning set forth in section thirty-three
hundred two of the public health law.
(b) "Pharmacy benefit manager" means a third-party administrator that
manages prescription drug programs for health plans, negotiating costs
and ensuring access to medications.
(c) "Indirect control" means any agreement, arrangement, contract,
ownership stake, or other relationship that gives an owner or operator
of a pharmacy the ability to influence or direct the operations of any
insurance company or pharmacy benefits manager in the state.
2. It shall be unlawful for any person or entity to directly or indi-
rectly own, operate, control, or direct the operation of the whole or
any part of an insurance company and/or a pharmacy benefit manager
and/or a pharmacy or any combination thereof.
3. Not later than three years after the effective date of this
section, any person or entity in violation of subdivision two of this
section shall divest from such pharmacy, insurance company, and/or phar-
macy benefit manager.
4. The attorney general may bring a civil action against any person or
entity that violates this section and may recover the following:
(a) a civil penalty of ten thousand dollars per day for a violation of
this section; and
(b) costs and reasonable attorneys' fees.
EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets
[ ] is old law to be omitted.
LBD13807-05-6

S. 9191--A 2
5. An insurance company, pharmacy, or pharmacy benefit manager found
in violation of this section by the attorney general shall be ineligible
to receive payment under any program authorized pursuant to article five
of the social services law until such violation is deemed resolved by
the attorney general.
§ 2. This act shall take effect immediately.